morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
LEXICON VNMaCont
    NcompCont; ! includes final
    D_lI;
    ND_lIk;
    Deriv_MACA;
    D_CI;
    D_CIl; ! not likely
    D_sAl; ! not likely


LEXICON VNMakCont
                              ENDLEX;
                              NCaseNoGen;
                              NomPredicateMAK;

LEXICON Participle
%<part%:past%>%<Adj%>:^D^I^k@MB         PartCont;
%<part%:fut%>%<Adj%>:^(y)^Ac^A^k@MB     PartCont;
%<part%:pres%>%<Adj%>:^(y)^An@MB        PartCont;
%<part%:esi%>%<Adj%>:^(y)^As^I@MB       ENDLEX;  !TODO: a better tag name

LEXICON PartCont
                   ENDLEX;
                   Ncont;
!                   AdjCont;

! TODO: this part needs rework. The list below roughly follows
!       G&K and the SFST version.
!
LEXICON ConVerb

%<cv%:ip%>:^(y)^Ip@MB                       DerivACont;
%<cv%:meksizin%>:m^Aks^NS^Iz^In@MB             DerivACont;
%<cv%:ince%>:^(y)^Inc^A@MB                  DerivACont;
%<cv%:erek%>:^(y)^Ar^NS^Ak@MB                  DerivACont;
%<cv%:eli%>:^(y)^Al^I@MB                    DerivACont;
%<cv%:dikce%>:^D^Ik^C^A@MB                  DerivACont;
%<cv%:esiye%>:^(y)^As^Iy^A@MB               DerivACont;
%<cv%:ye%>:^(y)^A@MB                        DerivACont;
%<cv%:mesine%>:m^As^In^A@MB                 DerivACont;

LEXICON CVNeg
%<cv%:den%>:d^An@MB             DerivACont;
%<cv%:den%:z%>:zd^An@MB         DerivACont; ! this is informal

LEXICON CVcesine
%<cv%:cesine%>:^C^As^In^A@MB     DerivACont;

LEXICON CVcesinePagr
%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB  CVcesine;
%<2s%>:s^In@MB     CVcesine;
%<3s%>:0@MB        CVcesine;
%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB  CVcesine;
%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB  CVcesine;
%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB     CVcesine;


!
! The following defines behaviour of a small set of special words
! (mostly clitics). These are defined in clitics.lexc
!

! üzer (somewhat) is like `üst', but does not 
! occur in bare form. Below, we (currently) allow 
! it to form postpositional phrases just like üst/alt etc. 
! However, we do not allow it to function as adjectives.
!
!
! TODO: check whether this is too restrictive or not. 
!
LEXICON   uzerCont 
            uzerN;
            PostPlocation;

LEXICON uzerN
%<N%>:@RB     uzerNcont; 

LEXICON uzerNcont
                            Nplu;
                            Npos;
                            Ncase;
                            Nderiv;



LEXICON var
%<Exist%>:@RB Ncont;

LEXICON yok
%<Exist%:neg%>:@RB Ncont;

LEXICON degil
%<Not%>:@RB Ncont;

!LEXICON VYDCont
!            VYDPAgr;
!            VYDDir;
!            CplAll;
!
!LEXICON VYDPAgr
!%<1s%>:^(y)^Im@MB       VYDPAgrCont;
!%<2s%>:s^In@MB          VYDPAgrCont;
!%<3s%>:0@MB             VYDPAgrCont;
!%<3p%:%0%>:0@MB             VYDPAgrCont;
!%<1p%>:^(y)^Iz@MB       VYDPAgrCont;
!%<2p%>:s^In^Iz@MB       VYDPAgrCont;
!%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB          VYDPAgrCont;
!
!LEXICON VYDDir
!%<dir%>:^D^Ir@MB    VYDPAgrp3;
!
!LEXICON VYDPAgrCont
!                    ENDLEX;
!%<dir%>:^D^Ir@MB    ENDLEX;
!
!LEXICON  VYDPAgrp3
!%<3p%>:l^Ar@MB   ENDLEX;

!
! Punctuation
!

LEXICON  Punc
%<Punc%>:0     ENDLEX;

!
! non-puctuation symbols
!

LEXICON  Sym
%<Sym%>:0     ENDLEX;

!
! Derivational process.
!
! We include only a select set of relatively productive derivational
! morphemes here. However, the description below is still rather liberal. 
! Most derivational
! suffixes are either not very productive, or restrictive in their use more
! than prescribed with the rules below.
!
! The first part organizes the entry point to the classes of
! derivational suffixes. Then we describe the actual suffixes. And
! later how they continue. Entry/exit parts are rather redundant,
! However, it helps if certain restrictions (for example, not allowing
! indefinite number of derivations.
! 
!
! TODO: better handling of derivations. 
!

LEXICON Mderiv
        MN_zero;
        ND_lIk;

LEXICON Nderiv
            D_lI;
!            D_sIz; ! sIz can combine after most of the inflectional suffixes
            ND_lIk;
            Dimin;
            ND_CA;
            D_CI;
            D_CIl;

            D_lA;

            ND_lAn;
            ND_lAS;
            D_sAl;
            D_imsi;
            D_si;
            D_mtrak;
!            D_gil; ! this works only in special cases.
!            D_inc;  ! ilgi-nç - any other?
!            D_al;
!            D_ik;
!            D_em;

LEXICON Pderiv
            D_lI;
            D_sIz;
            ND_lIk;
            PD_CA;
            D_CI;
            D_CIl;
            ND_lAS;

LEXICON Jderiv
            JD_lIk;
            D_lI;
            D_CI;
            D_sAl;

            D_lA;

            JD_CA;
            JD_lAn;
            JD_lAS;
            JN_zero;
            JP_poss;
            D_imsi;
            D_mtrak;

LEXICON Aderiv
            D_sIz;
            AD_lIk;
            AD_CA;
            AN_zero;
!            AJ_zero;

LEXICON Vderiv
            D_yIcI;
            D_yIS;
            D_yAsI;
            D_Ik;

LEXICON D_Ik
%<ik%>:^I^k@MB       DerivJCont;

LEXICON Oderiv
            D_lA;

! -lI is productive. The simple example is 
!           şeker `sugar' -> şeker-li `[something] with sugar' 
!    some forms are lexicalized, but in most cases semantics is clear.
!
! -lI makes nouns or adjective from nouns or adjectives, although
!     less likely, it may also make adverbs.
!       N -> N : atlı
!       N -> J : akıllı
!       J -> J : mavili
!
!   Here, we make use of the fact that adjectives can become a noun
!   with a zero derivation, and assume that -lI only derives
!   adjectives from nouns. This may not be too far from reality
!   either. Since the first example above `atlı' is also an adjective,
!   and the noun form has a similar sense as any other noun derived
!   from adjectives. This is less clear for J->J case, but it is more
!   reasonable to assume that `mavi' in the example above refers to
!   the color, hence it must start as a noun, likely by derivation from 
!   the adjective.
!
LEXICON   D_lI
%<li%>:l^I@MB         DerivJCont;
%<li%>:l^I@MB         DerivACont;

! -sIz behaves almost exactly like -lI, with the opposite meaning.
!           şeker `sugar' -> şeker-siz `[something] without sugar' 
!
! Further, -sIz tends to appear after some nominal suffixes, for
! example: 'çocuk-lar-ım-sız'. In principle, it can attach wherever 
! a case suffix can (which may raise the question whether it may 
! function as a case suffix or not---`abessive case'?). For most of
! these cases -lI may be plausible too, but it sounds less likely,
! possibly because the instrumental/commutative suffix has a similar
! function. We do not allow -lI to combine that freely, unless/until data
! dictates so.
!
! it is more likely for -sIz to form adverbs 
!       N -> N : kitap-sız (lexicalized)
!       N -> J : akılsız 
!       N -> A : arabasız
LEXICON   D_sIz
%<siz%>:s^Iz@MB       DerivJCont;
%<siz%>:s^Iz@MB       DerivACont;

! -lIK makes nouns from nouns, adjectives adverbs
!       N -> N: kitap-lık, kral-lık
!       J -> N: iyi-lik
!       A -> N: yavaş-lık
!
LEXICON   ND_lIk
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivNCont;
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivJCont;
LEXICON   JD_lIk
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivNCont;
LEXICON   AD_lIk
%<lik%>:l^I^k@MB       DerivNCont;

! -arası `between' forms some compund adjectives from 
!        plural nouns this is quite productive.
!        uluslar-arası, bölgeler-arası, ilkokullar-arası
!
!
LEXICON   D_arasi
%<arasi%>:arası@MB            DerivJCont;

! -(I)mtrak mainly attaches adjectives relating to colors and
! tastes, but it may also attach to other adjectives an nouns.
! Unusual examples from the web: devlet-imtrak, gizem-li-mtrak
!
! TODO: It seems if the stem ends with `m' the suffix may become -trak.
!       film-trak, sağlam-trak

LEXICON D_mtrak
%<imtrak%>:^(I)mtrak@MB              DerivJCont;

! -(I)msI also makes adjectives from nouns and adjectives.
!           mavi-msi, tatlı-msı, gül-ümsü
!
LEXICON   D_imsi
%<imsi%>:^(I)ms^I@MB     DerivJCont;

LEXICON Root
var       var;
yok       yok;
değil     degil;
üzer                    uzerCont;! this one is a bound root
